Washington statutes.
RCW 43.72.912

Savings—1993 c 492.

The enactment of this act does not have the effect of terminating, or in any way modifying, any obligation or any liability, civil or criminal, which was already in existence on the effective date of this act.

[ 1993 c 492 s 491.]